Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§436B-1 Short title. This chapter
shall be known as and may be cited as the Professional and Vocational Licensing
Act. [L 1991, c 111, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 202, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next